Hawaii statutes.
§636C-6 Fees. Any person filing a
foreign judgment shall pay $100 to the clerk of the court. Fees for docketing,
transcription, or other enforcement proceedings shall be as provided by law for
judgments of the court of this State. [L 1983, c 31, pt of §1; am L 1998, c
128, §6]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next